Illinois, session 104th, SB2013.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the Stop 5Online Booking Scams Act. 6    Section 5. Definitions. As used in this Act:7    "Affiliation contract" means a contract between an online 8platform and (i) the owner of the physical accommodation, (ii) 9the entity that operates the physical accommodation, (iii) the 10franchisor of the physical accommodation, or (iv) any entity 11authorized to enter into contracts for online booking services 12on behalf of the owner, operator, or franchisor.13    "Exhibition organizer or meeting planner" means the person 14responsible for all aspects of planning, promoting, and 15producing a meeting, conference, event, or exhibition, 16including overseeing and arranging all physical accommodation 17reservation plans and contracts for the meeting, conference, 18event, or exhibition.19    "Online platform" means a website, mobile application, 20call center, service, artificial intelligence system, 21automated agent, or functionally similar technology that 22facilitates the reservation or booking of physical 23accommodations.  SB2013 Engrossed- 2 -LRB104 10262 SPS 20336 b1    "Physical accommodation" has the meaning given to the term 2"hotel" in the Hotel Operators' Occupation Tax Act.3    "Shared hotel brand" means an identifying trademark that a 4hotel operator is expressly licensed to operate under in 5accordance with the terms of a hotel franchise or management 6agreement.7    "Third-party hotel booking website" means an online 8platform that facilitates the reservation or booking of 9physical accommodations in this State for consumers that is 10not directly affiliated with the physical accommodation being 11reserved or booked. "Third-party hotel booking website" does 12not include:13        (1) an online platform that is operated under a shared 14    hotel brand;15        (2) an online platform that facilitates the 16    reservation or booking of physical accommodations by 17    connecting consumers to operators and owners of rental 18    properties, hotels, motels, or other short-term 19    accommodations, if the online platform has an affiliation 20    contract for the physical accommodation for which the 21    online platform is facilitating bookings; or22        (3) an exhibition organizer or meeting planner or the 23    official housing bureau for a meeting, conference, event, 24    or exhibition held at the physical accommodation. 25    Section 10. Requirements for third-party hotel booking   SB2013 Engrossed- 3 -LRB104 10262 SPS 20336 b1websites. A third-party hotel booking website shall not 2facilitate the reservation or booking of physical 3accommodations in this State without clearly and conspicuously 4disclosing to the consumer that:5        (1) the third-party hotel booking website is a 6    third-party booking service and is not directly affiliated 7    with the physical accommodation; and8        (2) the consumer is not directly making a reservation 9    or booking with the physical accommodation itself and the 10    third-party hotel booking website functions as an 11    unaffiliated intermediary for the transaction. 12    Section 15. Placement of disclosure.13    (a) The disclosure required under Section 10 shall be 14displayed in a clear and conspicuous manner on the webpage or 15interface where the consumer selects physical accommodations 16for reservation or booking and shall appear first in any 17search results. A disclosure is not clear and conspicuous if a 18consumer must take any action to see it, such as clicking on a 19hyperlink or hovering over an icon.20    (b) The disclosure shall appear prior to the entry of any 21personal data and shall be separate from any general terms and 22conditions or legal disclaimers.23    (c) In any oral communication with a consumer, the 24disclosure shall be communicated before any offer or 25information regarding the physical accommodation.   SB2013 Engrossed- 4 -LRB104 10262 SPS 20336 b1    Section 20. Prohibition on terms and conditions 2exclusivity. The disclosure required under Section 10 shall 3not be included solely in the third-party hotel booking 4website's general terms and conditions or in any other section 5of the website that requires the consumer to click through 6multiple links or read extensive legal text. 7    Section 25. Enforcement under the Consumer Fraud and 8Deceptive Business Practices Act. The Attorney General may 9enforce violations of this Act as an unlawful practice under 10the Consumer Fraud and Deceptive Business Practices Act. All 11remedies, penalties, and authority granted to the Attorney 12General by that Act shall be available to the Attorney General 13for the enforcement of this Act. 14    Section 30. The Consumer Fraud and Deceptive Business 15Practices Act is amended by adding Section 2MMMM as follows: 16    (815 ILCS 505/2MMMM new)17    Sec. 2MMMM. Violations of the Stop Online Booking Scams 18Act. A person who violates the Stop Online Booking Scams Act 19commits an unlawful practice within the meaning of this Act. 20    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect January 211, 2027.